Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-5707.01
County average
weekly wage, defined.

County average weekly wage
for any year
means the most recent average weekly wage paid by all employers in the county
as reported by the Department of Labor by October 1 of the year prior to application.

Laws 2008, LB895, § 8;

Laws 2013, LB34, § 1.